District of Columbia statutes.
38-703

Liability for damaged books.

Parents and guardians of pupils shall be responsible for all books loaned to the children in their charge and shall be held liable for the full price of every such book destroyed, lost, or so damaged as to be made unfit for use by other pupils.

Jan. 31, 1930, 46 Stat. 62, ch. 32, § 3
1981 Ed., § 31-703.
1973 Ed., § 31-403.